Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-847
Bond issuance; state or political subdivision; no obligation; statement;
expenses.

Bonds issued pursuant to the Nebraska
Educational, Health, and Social
Services Finance Authority Act shall not be deemed to constitute
a debt of the state or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of
the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but
such bonds shall be a limited obligation of the authority payable solely from
the funds, securities, or government securities pledged for their payment
as authorized in the act unless such bonds are refunded by refunding bonds
issued under the act, which refunding bonds shall be payable solely from funds,
securities, or government securities pledged for their payment as authorized
in the act. All such revenue bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement
to the effect that the bonds, as to both principal and interest, are not an
obligation of the State of Nebraska or of any political subdivision thereof
but are limited obligations of the authority payable solely from revenue,
securities, or government securities, as the case may be, pledged for their
payment. All expenses incurred in carrying out the act shall be payable solely
from funds provided under the authority of the act, and nothing contained
in the act shall be construed to authorize the authority to incur indebtedness
or liability on behalf of or payable by the state or any political subdivision
thereof.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 44;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2944;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 44;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1744;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 47.